Hawaii statutes.
§466J-6 Persons exempted. (a) Any
provision in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a license shall not
be required for:

(1) A licensed medical practitioner in radiology;

(2) A licensed practitioner of nuclear medicine;

(3) A licensed physician assistant;

(4) A licensed doctor of dentistry;

(5) A licensed dental technician;

(6) A licensed dental hygienist;

(7) A student in an approved school for
radiographers, radiation therapists, or nuclear medicine technologists, or in a
school of medicine, podiatry, dentistry, or a chiropractic school; provided
that the student is operating x-ray machines under the direct supervision of a
licensed radiographer, licensed radiation therapist, licensed nuclear medicine
technologist, or a qualified person pursuant to this chapter; and

(8) [Paragraph effective until December 31, 2016.
For paragraph effective January 1, 2017, see below.] A radiologist duly licensed to practice
medicine and radiology services in another state who uses telehealth while located
in this State to provide radiology services to a patient who is located in the
state in which the radiologist is licensed. For the purposes of this
paragraph:

"Radiologist" means a doctor of
medicine or a doctor of osteopathy certified in radiology by the American Board
of Radiology or the American Board of Osteopathy.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications, as that term is defined in section 269-1, including but not
limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive
and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous
information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including
diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical
interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health
care services and information to parties separated by distance. Standard
telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail texts, in combination or
by themselves, do not constitute a telehealth service for the purposes of this
paragraph.

(8) [Paragraph effective January 1, 2017. For
paragraph effective until December 31, 2016, see above.] A radiologist duly licensed to practice
medicine and radiology services in another state who uses telehealth while
located in this State to provide radiology services to a patient who is located
in the state in which the radiologist is licensed; provided that services
provided by telehealth pursuant to this paragraph shall be consistent with all
federal and state privacy, security, and confidentiality laws. For the
purposes of this paragraph:

"Distant site" means the location
of the radiologist delivering services through telehealth at the time the
services are provided.

"Originating site" means the
location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health
care provider, at the time services are provided by a radiologist through
telehealth, including but not limited to a radiologist's or health care
provider's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other
non-medical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based
health centers, or the work location of a patient.

"Radiologist" means a doctor of
medicine or a doctor of osteopathy certified in radiology by the American Board
of Radiology or the American Board of Osteopathy.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications, as that term is defined in section 269-1, to encompass four
modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation,
and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time
video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a
patient is at an originating site and the radiologist is at a distant site.
Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail texts, in
combination or by themselves, do not constitute a telehealth service for the
purposes of this paragraph.

(b) The board may issue special temporary permits
upon request to unlicensed radiographers working in shortage areas. [L 1974, c
253, pt of §2; am L 1980, c 128, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 273, §8; am L 1995, c
143, §6; am L 2007, c 255, §2; am L 2009, c 151, §20; am L 2014, c 159, §11; am
L 2016, c 226, §12]

Note

L 2007, c 255, §3 provides:

"SECTION 3. Nothing herein shall be deemed to permit a
radiologist without a license to practice medicine in Hawaii, wherever located,
to provide services to a patient who is located in Hawaii."

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next